District of Columbia statutes.
34-606

Appeal limited to questions of law.

In the determination of any appeal from an order or decision of the Commission the review by the Court shall be limited to questions of law, including constitutional questions; and the findings of fact by the Commission shall be conclusive unless it shall appear that such findings of the Commission are unreasonable, arbitrary, or capricious.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 989, ch. 150, § 8, par. 66
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 883, ch. 742, § 2
1981 Ed., § 43-906.
1973 Ed., § 43-706.
Former § 43-910 1981 Ed., 49 Stat. 885, ch. 742, § 4, provided that if any provision this section or the application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity of the remainder of said sections and of the application of such provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.